src-fst-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
(11) Present Participle:
* :%^VOWRaise%^PAL FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ;  (11) +V+Act+PrsPrc: kaʹddi

(12) Weak-RaisedVowel-NoPalatalization
* :%^V2VV%^VOWRaise VSUF-CHED_ED ;   (12) +Der+Der/ched: kaadd-

* LEXICON V_VEAQDDDED  veäʹdˈded:veädd
* LEXICON V0_VEAQDDDED  veäʹdˈded:veädd
* :%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ;  (1) +V+Inf: veäʹdˈded
V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

Strong-LowVowel-No-palatalization
* : VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ;  (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: veädd
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

ExtraStrong-LowVowel-Palatalization
* +Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^PAL%>e K ;  (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: veäʹdˈde
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ;  (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vieʹdˈde
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

Weak-StableV-Palatalization
* :%^PALẸ%^PAL%^CCC2CC VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ;  (5) viẹʹdd
Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CCC2CC%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ;  (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: vieʹddež
Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

Weak-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
* :%^CCC2CC%> VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ;  (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: veäddas
Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ;  (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: viâdˈdu
Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
* VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_ED ;  (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: veädˈdaz
Imprt+Pl3

(11) Present Participle:

(12) Weak-RaisedVowel-NoPalatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^CCC2CC VSUF-CHED_ED ;   (12) +Der+Der/ched: viâdd-

* LEXICON V_KAAQKHKHED  kââʹǩǩed:kââ%{ʹØ%}kk
* LEXICON IV_KAAQKHKHED  kââʹǩǩed:kââ%{ʹØ%}kk
* LEXICON V0_KAAQKHKHED  kââʹǩǩed:kââ%{ʹØ%}kk
Strong-HighVowel-Palatalization
* :%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ;  (1) +V+Inf: kââʹǩǩed
V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

Strong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
* : VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ;  (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kââkk
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-Palatalization
* +Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VV2V%^PAL%>e K ;  (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kâʹǩǩe
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
* :%^VV2V%^VOWRaise%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ;  (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kõʹǩǩe
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

Weak-StableV-Palatalization
* :%^PAL%^KK2GG VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ;  (5) kââʹjj
Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^KK2GG VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ;  (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: kõõʹjjež
Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

Weak-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
* :%^KK2GG%> VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ;  (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: kââǥǥas
Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
* :%^VV2V%^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ;  (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: kõkku
Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
* :%^VV2V VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_ED ;  (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: kâkkaz
Imprt+Pl3

(10) Allegro for incoative: kâʹǩ»

(11) Present Participle: 
* :%^VOWRaise%^PAL FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ;  (11) kõõʹǩǩi

(12) Weak-RaisedVowel-NoPalatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^KK2GG VSUF-CHED_ED ;   (12) +Der+Der/ched: kõõǥǥ-

* LEXICON V_PUEAQTTED  pueʹtted:puätt
* LEXICON IV_PUEAQTTED  pueʹtted:puätt
* LEXICON V0_PUEAQTTED  pueʹtted:puätt

Strong-HighVowel-Palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ;		 (1) puẹʹtted 
V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

Strong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
* : VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; 	     		 (2) puätt
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-Palatalization
* +Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^PAL%^CC2CCC%>e K ;      (3) puäʹtˈte
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2CCC%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ;  (4) pueʹtˈte
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALÕ%^PAL%^CC2CCC%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ;  (4) puõʹtˈte
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

Weak-StableV-Palatalization
* :%^PAL%^CC2C VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ;  (5) puäʹđ-
Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2C%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ;  (6 pueʹđež
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALÕ%^PAL%^CC2C%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ;  (6 puõʹđež
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALÕ%^PAL%^CC2C VSUF-IND-PRT-SG3-PL1-PL2_ ;  ( puõʹđi
* +Pot+Sg3:%^PAL%^CC2C%>ež   K ;  (6   puäʹđež
Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

Weak-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
* :%^CC2C%> VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ;  (7) puäđ-
Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^PAL%^CC2C%> VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ;  (5 ?2 ?7) puäʹđ-

ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALÕ VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ;  (8 puõttu
* :%^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ;  (8 puåttu
Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization (9)
* :%^CC2CCC VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_ED ;   puätˈtaz
Imprt+Pl3

Allegro (10)

(11) Present Participle:
* +Use/NG:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%> FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ;  (11) pueʹtti
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALÕ%^PAL%> FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ;  (11) puõʹtti

(12) Weak-RaisedVowel-NoPalatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^CC2C VSUF-CHED_ED ;   (12) +Der+Der/ched: puåđ

* LEXICON V_SHKUEAQTTED  škueʹtted:puätt
* LEXICON IV_SHKUEAQTTED  škueʹtted:puätt
* LEXICON TV_SHKUEAQTTED  škueʹtted:puätt
* LEXICON V0_SHKUEAQTTED  pueʹtted:puätt

Strong-HighVowel-Palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ;		 (1) puẹʹtted 
V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

Strong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
* : VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; 	     		 (2) puätt
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-Palatalization
* +Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^PAL%^CC2CCC%>e K ;      (3) puäʹtˈte
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2CCC VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ;  (4) pueʹtˈte
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^VOWRaise%^PALÕ%^PAL%^CC2CCC VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ;  (4) puõʹtˈte
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

Weak-StableV-Palatalization
* :%^PAL%^CC2C VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ;  (5) puäʹđ-
Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2C VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ;  (6 pueʹđež
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^VOWRaise%^PALÕ%^PAL%^CC2C VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ;  (6 puõʹđež
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALÕ%^PAL%^CC2C VSUF-IND-PRT-SG3-PL1-PL2_ ;  ( puõʹđi
* +Pot+Sg3:%^PAL%^CC2C%>ež   K ;  (6   puäʹđež
Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

Weak-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
* :%^CC2C VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ;  (7) puäđ-
Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^PAL%^CC2C VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ;  (5 ?2 ?7) puäʹđ-

ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALÕ VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ;  (8 puõttu
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ;  (8 puåttu
Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization (9)
* :%^CC2CCC VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_ED ;   puätˈtaz
Imprt+Pl3

No Allegro (10) 2015-12-04
:%^VOWLower%^PAL%^CC2CAllegro%>e FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ;

(11) Present Participle:
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ;  (11) pueʹtti
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALÕ%^PAL FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ;  (11) puõʹtti

* LEXICON V_JIEAQLLED  jieʹlled:jeä%{ʹØ%}ll
* LEXICON IV_JIEAQLLED  jieʹlled:jeä%{ʹØ%}ll
* LEXICON V0_JIEAQLLED  jieʹlled:jeä%{ʹØ%}ll
like: V_PIEAQKHKHED

Strong-HighVowel-Palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ;		 (1) jiẹʹlled 
V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

Strong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
* : VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; 	     		 (2) jeäll
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-Palatalization
* +Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^PAL%^CC2CCC%>e K ;      (3) jeäʹlˈle
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2CCC%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ;  (4) jieʹlˈle
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^VOWRaise%^PALÕ%^PAL%^CC2CCC%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ;  (4) jiõʹlˈle
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

Weak-StableV-Palatalization
* :%^PAL%^CC2C VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ;  (5) jeäʹl-
Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
Ger.Temp.PxSg3: jeäʹleeʹstes

Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2C%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ;  (6 jieʹlež

* :%^VOWRaise%^PALÕ%^PAL%^CC2C VSUF-IND-PRT-SG3-PL1-PL2_ ;  ( jiõʹli
* +Pot+Sg3:%^PAL%^CC2C%>ež   K ;  (6   puäʹđež
Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

Weak-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
* :%^CC2C%> VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ;  (7) jeäl-
Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^PAL%^CC2C%> VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ;  (5 ?2 ?7) jeäʹl-

ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ;  (8 jiâllu
Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization (9)
* :%^CC2CCC VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_ED ;   jeälˈlaz
Imprt+Pl3

Allegro (10)
* :%^PAL%^CC2CAllegro%>e FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ;  jeäʹle

(11) Present Participle:
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%> FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ;  (11) jieʹlli
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^VOWRaise%^PALÕ%^PAL%> FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ;  (11) jiõʹlli

(12)
* :%^VOWRaise%^CC2C VSUF-CHED_ED ;   (12) +Der+Der/ched: 

* LEXICON V_PIEAQKHKHED  pieʹǩǩed:peäkk
* LEXICON V0_PIEAQKHKHED  pieʹǩǩed:peäkk
* Yaml: **V-piekked**
Strong-HighVowel-Palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ;  (1) +V+Inf: piẹʹǩǩed
V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

Strong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
* : VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ;  (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: peäkk
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-Palatalization
* +Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^PAL%^CC2CCC%>e K ;  (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: peäʹǩˈǩe
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2CCC%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ;  (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pieʹǩˈǩe
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

Weak-StableV-Palatalization 
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL%^KK2GG VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ;  (5) piẹʹjj-
Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
Ger.Temp.PxSg3: peäʹjjeeʹstes

Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^KK2GG%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ;   (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: !! pieʹjjež
Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

Weak-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
* :%^KK2GG VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ;  (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: peäǥǥas
Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^CC2CCC VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ;  (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: piâkˈku
Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
* :%^CC2CCC VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_ED ;  (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: peäkˈkaz
Imprt+Pl3

(10) Allegro for incoative: pieʹj» 2015-09-03 IS THIS CORRECT

(11) Present Participle:
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%> FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ;  (11) +V+Act+PrsPrc: pieʹǩǩi

(12)
* :%^VOWRaise%^KK2GG VSUF-CHED_ED ;   (12) +Der+Der/ched: 

* LEXICON V_VUEAIQNNED  vueiʹnned:vuäinn
* LEXICON TV_VUEAIQNNED  vueiʹnned:vuäinn
* LEXICON V0_VUEAIQNNED  vueiʹnned:vuäinn

(11) Present Participle:
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ;  (11) vueiʹnni

(12)
* :%^VOWRaise%^XYY2XY VSUF-CHED_ED ;   (12) +Der+Der/ched: 

* LEXICON V_VUEAQDHDHED  vueʹđđed:vuäđđ
* LEXICON V0_VUEAQDHDHED  vueʹđđed:vuäđđ
Strong-HighVowel-Palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ;           (1) vuẹʹđđed
V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

Strong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
* : VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ;                        (2) vuäđđ
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-Palatalization
* +Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^PAL%^CC2CCC%>e K ;      (3) vuäʹđˈđe
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2CCC%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ;  (4) vueʹđˈđe
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4
